Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
APPLICATION OF ACT

7-137-101. Application to existing corporations.

For purposes of this article, "existing corporate entity" means any corporate entity that was in existence on June 30, 1998, and that was incorporated under articles 20 to 29 of this title or elected to accept such articles as provided therein.

A corporate entity that was either incorporated under or elected to accept articles 20 to 29 of this title and that was suspended or, as a consequence of such suspension, dissolved by operation of law before July 1, 1998, and was eligible for reinstatement or restoration, renewal, and revival on June 30, 1998, shall be deemed to be in existence on that date for purposes of this subsection (1) and shall be deemed administratively dissolved on the date of such suspension for purposes of section 7-134-105.

A corporate entity that was either incorporated under or elected to accept articles 20 to 29 of this title and that was suspended or, as a consequence of such suspension, dissolved by operation of law before July 1, 1998, and was not eligible for reinstatement or restoration, renewal, and revival on June 30, 1998, shall be treated as a domestic entity as to which a constituent filed document has been filed by, or placed in the records of, the secretary of state and that has been dissolved for purposes of section 7-90-1001.

Subject to this section, articles 121 to 137 of this title apply to all existing corporate entities subject to articles 20 to 29 of this title.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws of an existing corporate entity recognize the right of a member to transfer such member's membership interests in such corporate entity, such interests shall be presumed to be nontransferable. However, if the transferability of such interests is not prohibited by such articles of incorporation or bylaws, such transferability may be established by a preponderance of the evidence taking into account any representation made by the corporate entity, the practice of such corporate entity, other transactions involving such interests, and other facts bearing on the existence of the rights to transfer such interests.

Until the articles of incorporation of an existing corporate entity are amended or restated on or after July 1, 1998, they need not be amended or restated to comply with articles 121 to 137 of this title.

Unless changed by an amendment to its articles of incorporation, members or classes of members of an existing corporate entity shall be deemed to be voting members for purposes of articles 121 to 137 of this title if such members or classes of members, on June 30, 1998, had the right by reason of a provision of the corporate entity's articles of incorporation or bylaws, or by a custom, practice, or tradition, to vote for the election of a director or directors.

The bylaws of an existing corporate entity may be amended as provided in its articles of incorporation or bylaws. Unless otherwise so provided, the power to amend such bylaws shall be vested in the board of directors.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 749, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 98:

(6) added, p. 626, § 38, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1219, § 31, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(b) amended and (1)(c) added, p. 883, § 85, effective July 1.

7-137-102. Pre-1968 corporate entities - failure to file reports and designate registered agents - dissolution.

Corporate entities that were formed prior to January 1, 1968, and that did not elect to be governed by articles 20 to 29 of this title and could, if they so elected, elect to be governed by articles 121 to 137 of this title, but that have not done so, are nevertheless reporting entities that are subject to part 5 of article 90 of this title, providing for periodic reports from reporting entities, and are domestic entities that are subject to part 7 of article 90 of this title, providing for registered agents and service of process.

Every corporate entity that could or has elected to be governed by articles 20 to 29 or 121 to 137 of this title whose articles of incorporation, affidavit of incorporation, or other basic corporate charter, by whatever name denominated, is not on file in the records of the secretary of state shall file a certified copy of such articles of incorporation, affidavit of incorporation, or other basic corporate charter in the office of the secretary of state. Such certified copy may be secured from any clerk or recorder with whom the instrument may be filed or recorded.

If any corporate entity, formed prior to January 1, 1968, that could elect to be governed by articles 20 to 29 or 121 to 137 of this title, but that has not so elected and has failed to file periodic reports or maintain a registered agent, may be declared delinquent pursuant to section 7-90-902.

Any corporate entity formed prior to January 1, 1968, that could elect to be governed by articles 20 to 29 of this title, that was suspended or was declared defunct, but not dissolved by operation of law under section 7-20-105 before July 1, 1998, and that was eligible for reinstatement on June 30, 1998, shall be deemed administratively dissolved on the date of such suspension for purposes of section 7-134-105 and may reinstate itself as a nonprofit corporation as provided in part 10 of article 90 of this title.

Any nonprofit corporate entity formed prior to January 1, 1968, that could elect to be governed by articles 20 to 29 of this title, that was suspended, declared defunct, administratively dissolved, or dissolved by operation of law, and continues to operate for nonprofit purposes and does not wind up its business and affairs, shall be deemed an unincorporated organization that qualifies as a nonprofit association as provided in section 7-30-101.1 for purposes of the "Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act", article 30 of this title, unless such corporate entity is eligible to reinstate itself as a nonprofit corporation as provided in part 10 of article 90 of this title and does so reinstate itself.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 750, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 987, § 100, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1), (3), (4), and (5) amended, p. 2352, § 338, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1516, § 313, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 1219, § 32, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(4) amended, p. 884, § 86, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1) and (3) amended, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 2000, § 29, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

Section 7-20-105, referred to in subsection (4), was repealed, effective July 1, 1998.

7-137-103. Application to foreign nonprofit corporations.

A foreign nonprofit corporation authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state on June 30, 1998, is subject to articles 121 to 137 of this title but is not required to obtain new authorization to transact business or conduct activities under said articles.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 751, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2353, § 339, effective July 1, 2004.